Indiana, session 2026, HB1260.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 27-1-3-22 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 22. (a) As used in this
section, "fraudulent insurance act" means:
(1) the preparation or presentation of a written statement as part
of, or in support of:
(A) a fraudulent application for the issuance or rating of a
policy of commercial insurance; or
(B) a fraudulent claim under a policy of commercial or
personal insurance; or
(2) the concealment, for the purpose of misleading, of information
concerning any fact material to an application or claim described
in subdivision (1).
(b) As used in this section, "fraudulent insurance act" includes the
act or omission of a person who, knowingly and with intent to defraud,
does any of the following:
(1) Presents, causes to be presented, or prepares with knowledge
or belief that it will be presented, to or by an insurer, a reinsurer,
a purported insurer or reinsurer, a broker, or an agent of an
insurer, reinsurer, purported insurer or reinsurer, or broker, an
oral or written statement that the person knows to contain
materially false information as part of, in support of, or
concerning any fact that is material to:
(A) an application for the issuance of an insurance policy;
HEA 1260 — Concur

2
(B) the rating of an insurance policy;
(C) a claim for payment or benefit under an insurance policy;
(D) premiums paid on an insurance policy;
(E) payments made in accordance with the terms of an
insurance policy;
(F) an application for a certificate of authority;
(G) the financial condition of an insurer, a reinsurer, or a
purported insurer or reinsurer; or
(H) the acquisition of an insurer or a reinsurer;
or conceals any information concerning a subject set forth in
clauses (A) through (H).
(2) Solicits or accepts new or renewal insurance risks by or for an
insolvent insurer, reinsurer, or other entity regulated under this
title.
(3) Removes or attempts to remove:
(A) the assets;
(B) the record of assets, transactions, and affairs; or
(C) a material part of the assets or the record of assets,
transactions, and affairs;
of an insurer, a reinsurer, or another entity regulated under this
title, from the home office, other place of business, or place of
safekeeping of the insurer, reinsurer, or other regulated entity, or
conceals or attempts to conceal from the department assets or
records referred to in clauses (A) through (C).
(4) Diverts, attempts to divert, or conspires to divert funds of an
insurer, a reinsurer, another entity regulated under the Indiana
Code, or other persons, in connection with any of the following:
(A) The transaction of insurance or reinsurance.
(B) The conduct of business activities by an insurer, a
reinsurer, or another entity regulated under this title.
(C) The formation, acquisition, or dissolution of an insurer, a
reinsurer, or another entity regulated under this title.
(c) A person or entity regulated under this title that has
knowledge or a reasonable belief that a fraudulent insurance act is
being or has been committed shall furnish the information to:
(1) the department; or
(2) the National Insurance Crime Bureau;
not later than sixty (60) days after the person receives notice of the
fraudulent insurance act. If the National Insurance Crime Bureau
receives information under this subsection, the National Insurance
Crime Bureau shall disclose the information to the department.
(c) (d) A person or entity who acts without malice, fraudulent
HEA 1260 — Concur

3
intent, or bad faith is not subject to civil or criminal liability for filing
a report or furnishing, orally or in writing, other information
concerning a suspected, anticipated, or completed fraudulent insurance
act if the report or other information is provided to or received from
any of the following:
(1) The department or an agent, an employee, or a designee of the
department.
(2) Law enforcement officials or an agent or employee of a law
enforcement official.
(3) The National Association of Insurance Commissioners.
(4) Any agency or bureau of federal or state government
established to detect and prevent fraudulent insurance acts.
(5) Any other organization established to detect and prevent
fraudulent insurance acts.
(6) The National Insurance Crime Bureau.
(7) Any person or entity regulated under this title.
(6) (8) An agent, an employee, or a designee of an entity referred
to in subdivisions (3) through (5). (7).
(d) (e) This section does not abrogate or modify in any way any
common law or statutory privilege or immunity.
SECTION 2. IC 27-1-3-23 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 23. (a) For the purposes
of this section, a party is "substantially justified" in initiating a civil
action if the action had a reasonable basis in law or fact at the time the
action was initiated.
(b) If:
(1) a person or entity referred to in section 22(c) 22(d) of this
chapter, or an employee or agent of a person or entity referred to
in section 22(c), 22(d), is the prevailing party in a civil action for
libel, slander, or any other relevant tort arising out of the filing of
a report or the furnishing of information under section 22(c) 22(d)
of this chapter; and
(2) the party who initiated the action was not substantially
justified in initiating the action;
the person, entity, employee, or agent referred to in subdivision (1) is
entitled to an award of attorney's fees and costs.
SECTION 3. IC 27-1-44.5-12 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) Except as provided in
subsections (b), (c), and (e), the fee schedule for each type of
unrestricted data request is as follows:
Non-program Affiliated Individual
HEA 1260 — Concur

4
Data Set Per Quarter Per Year
Member Eligibility $1,000 $4,000
Medical Claims $1,500 $6,000
Pharmacy Claims $ 500 $2,000
Hospital Encounters
Inpatient $1,500 $6,000
Outpatient $1,250 $5,000
Emergency Dept. $1,250 $5,000
Commercial Entity (Non-redistribution)
Data Set Per Quarter Per Year
Member Eligibility $1,500 $6,000
Medical Claims $2,250 $9,000
Pharmacy Claims $ 750 $3,000
Hospital Encounters
Inpatient $2,250 $9,000
Outpatient $1,875 $7,500
Emergency Dept. $1,875 $7,500
Nonprofit/Educational Entity
Data Set Per Quarter Per Year
Member Eligibility $ 250 $1,000
Medical Claims $ 375 $1,500
Pharmacy Claims $ 125 $ 500
Hospital Encounters
Inpatient $ 375 $1,500
Outpatient $ 312.50 $1,250
Emergency Dept. $ 312.50 $1,250
Commercial Redistributor (Resellers)
Data Set Per Quarter Per Year
Member Eligibility $2,500 $10,000
Medical Claims $3,750 $15,000
Pharmacy Claims $1,250 $5,000
Hospital Encounters
Inpatient $3,750 $15,000
Outpatient $3,125 $12,500
Emergency Dept. $3,125 $12,500
(b) Data files, reports, or tables not otherwise listed in
subsection (a) or custom data sets must be generated at a base rate
of eighty dollars ($80) per hour with a minimum one (1) hour
charge applied. An additional fee of three cents ($0.03) must be
charged per individual life generated in the data, report, or table.
A written estimate of the total cost must be provided to an entity
that requests data or information under this subsection before the
HEA 1260 — Concur

5
request is fulfilled.
(c) State or local agencies within the geographical boundaries of
Indiana that request data for public distribution or
non-redistribution purposes may not be charged a fee under this
section.
(d) If it is determined by the data base that access to the analytic
environment is necessary based on the quantity and type of data
requested, the requesting entity will incur an additional licensing
fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per month per user.
(e) Member eligibility data sets for the requested time period
must be provided at no charge if requested along with at least one
(1) other data set.
(f) A requesting entity may submit to the department a request
for a waiver of any applicable fees if the entirety of the entity's
research findings will be released to the public at no cost to the
reader.
(g) A fee collected under this section must be deposited in the
department of insurance fund created by IC 27-1-3-28.
(h) Before November 1, 2026, and before November 1 of each
year thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the budget
committee that contains the following information for the most
recently preceding state fiscal year:
(1) The total amount of fees collected in total and for each fee
type of unrestricted data.
(2) The number of individuals subject to fees in total and for
each fee type of unrestricted data.
(3) Additional fee amounts charted in subsection (b) and the
total amount collected.
(4) Additional licensing fee amounts charted in subsection (c)
and the total amount collected.
(5) The total fund balance in the department of insurance
fund under IC 27-1-3-28 as of June 30 of the most recently
preceding state fiscal year.
SECTION 4. IC 27-2-28-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2025,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) This chapter applies to a personal
automobile or homeowner's policy that is issued, delivered, amended,
or renewed on or after June 30, 2026. January 1, 2027.
(b) This chapter does not apply to:
(1) notices required by the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15
U.S.C. 1681 et seq.); or
(2) declinations of coverage.
HEA 1260 — Concur

6
SECTION 5. IC 27-2-28-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.226-2023,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "automobile policy"
means a policy providing one (1) or more of the types of insurance
described in Class 2(f) of IC 27-1-5-1.
(b) The term includes an automobile policy under which the
insured vehicle designated in the policy is rated as private
passenger.
(c) The term does not include personal insurance policies for the
coverage of:
(1) boats;
(2) inland marine;
(3) motorcycles;
(4) off-road vehicles;
(5) recreational vehicles;
(6) trailers;
(7) fleets;
(8) antique or collector vehicles;
(9) classic vehicles;
(10) specialty vehicles; or
(11) any other personal insurance policy not listed in
subdivisions (1) through (10).
SECTION 6. IC 27-2-28-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.226-2023,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) As used in this chapter, "homeowner's
policy" means a policy that provides:
(1) coverage for:
(A) damage to or the destruction of:
(i) a structure; or
(ii) a unit within a structure;
that is used as a residence by one (1) or more individuals; and
(B) damage to or the loss of personal property that is present
in the structure or unit described in clause (A);
caused by perils such as fire, hail, and lightning; and
(2) coverage against the civil liability of the policyholder arising
from bodily injury or property damage incurred by others.
(b) The term includes a mobile homeowner's policy,
manufactured homeowner's policy, condominium homeowner's
policy, and renter's coverage.
(c) The term does not include farm policies, nonowner occupied
dwellings, other residential policies that are not written on a
homeowner's policy form or other landlord policies.
HEA 1260 — Concur

7
SECTION 7. IC 27-2-28-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.226-2023,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) As used in this chapter, "material change"
means
(1) an a premium increase of more than ten percent (10%) over
the expiring premium for; or and above the increases in the
insurer's filed rate plan, including base rate increases and any
other changes to the insurer's filed rate plan.
(2) another adverse or unfavorable change in the terms of
coverage or amount of;
insurance in connection with a personal automobile or homeowner's
policy.
(b) The term does not include the following:
(1) An increase in the insurer's filed rate plan and automatic
inflationary increases.
(2) An additional premium due to a change initiated by the
insured, such as:
(A) adding or removing vehicles or drivers;
(B) adding an endorsement;
(C) adding additional coverages;
(D) adding covered premises; or
(E) increasing coverage limits or deductibles.
(3) An additional premium due to a change in risk exposure as a
result of the insured's participation in a usage based or telematics
insurance program.
(4) Changes resulting from a property inspection.
(5) For purposes of the second or subsequent renewals, rate
increases that are implemented over more than one (1) policy
period if:
(A) the implementation plan is included in the insurer's
filed rate plan; or
(B) the increase for any one (1) policy period is not more
than ten percent (10%) over the expiring policy period's
premium.
SECTION 8. IC 27-2-28-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.226-2023,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) An insurer that makes a material change to
an insured's personal automobile or homeowner's policy shall provide
a written notice to the insured that:
(1) explains the principal factors for the material change; or
(2) states that the insured has a right to request and obtain an
explanation of the principal factors for the material change.
HEA 1260 — Concur

8
(b) Not later than thirty (30) days after an insured who receives
a notice of a material change described in subsection (a)(2), the
insured may submit to the insurer a written request for an explanation
of the principal factors for the material change.
(c) Upon Not later than forty-five (45) days after receiving a
request for an explanation under subsection (b), the insurer shall
provide written notice to the insured explaining the principal factors for
the material change.
(d) An insurer shall provide a copy of a written notice provided
under subsection (a)(1) or (c):
(1) to the insurance producer, if any, who:
(A) represented:
(i) the insured in obtaining coverage from the insurer; or
(ii) the insurer in regard to the providing of coverage to the
insured; and
(B) is not an employee, an exclusive agent, or a captive agent
of the insurer; and
(2) to the insurer's reporting portal for agent communications.
(e) A written notice provided under subsection (a) or (c), or a
written request submitted under subsection (b), must be provided by:
(1) first class mail; or
(2) electronic delivery as set forth in IC 27-1-43.
SECTION 9. IC 27-2-28-12, AS ADDED BY P.L.226-2023,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) The commissioner shall adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 to implement this chapter.
(b) The rules adopted under subsection (a) must include monetary
penalties for a violation of this chapter that are consistent with other
penalties assessed for similar violations under this title.
(c) (b) The commissioner is solely responsible for the enforcement
of this chapter.
SECTION 10. IC 27-5.1-2-24.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 24.5. (a) The commissioner may
waive the requirements of this chapter or IC 27-1-9, whichever is
applicable, for a merger or consolidation of a farm mutual
insurance company with any other company (as defined in
IC 27-1-2-3) if:
(1) the farm mutual insurance company is notified that it will
lose reinsurance coverage within one hundred twenty (120)
days; or
(2) another emergency event occurs that places the farm
HEA 1260 — Concur

9
mutual insurance company in imminent danger of insolvency.
(b) A farm mutual insurance company that decides to merge or
consolidate as a result of an emergency event described in
subsection (a) shall provide notice of the emergency event to the
commissioner not later than ten (10) days after the emergency
event occurs.
(c) The commissioner shall issue a decision on the proposed
merger or consolidation not more than ninety (90) days after
receiving notice from a farm mutual insurance company under
subsection (b).
SECTION 11. IC 27-6-8-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. This chapter applies
to all kinds of direct insurance except:
(1) life, annuity, health, or disability insurance;
(2) mortgage guaranty, financial guaranty, or other forms of
insurance offering protection against investment risks;
(3) fidelity or surety bonds, or any other bonding obligations;
(4) credit insurance, vendors' single interest insurance, or
collateral protection insurance or similar insurance with the
primary purpose of protecting the interests of a creditor arising
out of a creditor-debtor transaction;
(5) other than coverages that may be set forth in a
cybersecurity insurance policy, warranty or service contract
insurance, including insurance that provides:
(A) for the repair, replacement, or service of goods or
property;
(B) indemnification for repair, replacement, or service for
the operational or structural failure of the goods or
property due to a defect in materials, workmanship, or
normal wear and tear; or
(C) reimbursement for the liability incurred by the issuer
of agreements or service contracts that provide the benefits
described in clauses (A) and (B);
(6) title insurance;
(7) ocean marine insurance;
(8) a transaction between a person or an affiliate of a person and
an insurer or an affiliate of an insurer that involves the transfer of
investment or credit risk without a transfer of insurance risk;
(9) insurance provided by or guaranteed by a government entity;
and
(10) insurance written on a retroactive basis to cover known
losses for which a claim has already been made and the claim is
HEA 1260 — Concur

10
known to the insurer at the time the insurance is bound.
SECTION 12. IC 27-6-8-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.158-2024,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) As used in this chapter, unless otherwise
provided:
(1) The term "account" means any one (1) of the three (3)
accounts created by section 5 of this chapter.
(2) The term "association" means the Indiana Insurance Guaranty
Association created by section 5 of this chapter.
(3) The term "commissioner" means the commissioner of
insurance of this state.
(4) The term "covered claim" means an unpaid claim which arises
out of and is within the coverage and not in excess of the
applicable limits of an insurance policy to which this chapter
applies issued by an insurer, if the insurer becomes an insolvent
insurer after the effective date (January 1, 1972) of this chapter
and (a) the claimant or insured is a resident of this state at the
time of the insured event or (b) the property from which the claim
arises is permanently located in this state. "Covered claim" shall
be limited as provided in section 7 of this chapter, and shall not
include the following:
(A) Any amount due any reinsurer, insurer, insurance pool, or
underwriting association, as subrogation recoveries or
otherwise. However, a claim for any such amount, asserted
against a person insured under a policy issued by an insurer
which has become an insolvent insurer, which if it were not a
claim by or for the benefit of a reinsurer, insurer, insurance
pool or underwriting association, would be a "covered claim"
may be filed directly with the receiver or liquidator of the
insolvent insurer, but in no event may any such claim be
asserted in any legal action against the insured of such
insolvent insurer.
(B) Any supplementary obligation including but not limited to
adjustment fees and expenses, attorney fees and expenses,
court costs, interest and bond premiums, whether arising as a
policy benefit or otherwise, prior to the appointment of a
liquidator.
(C) Any unpaid claim that is filed with the association after the
final date set by the court for the filing of claims against the
liquidator or receiver of an insolvent insurer. For the purpose
of filing a claim under this clause, notice of a claim to the
liquidator of the insolvent insurer is considered to be notice to
HEA 1260 — Concur

11
the association or the agent of the association and a list of
claims must be periodically submitted to the association (or
another state's association that is similar to the association) by
the liquidator.
(D) A claim that is excluded under section 11.5 of this chapter
due to the high net worth of an insured.
(E) Any claim by a person who directly or indirectly controls,
is controlled, or is under common control with an insolvent
insurer on December 31 of the year before the order of
liquidation.
(F) Any amount awarded as punitive or exemplary
damages.
(G) Any amount sought as a return of premium under any
retrospective rating plan.
(H) Any claim filed with the association or a liquidator for
protection afforded under the insured's policy for incurred
but not reported losses.
All covered claims filed in the liquidation proceedings shall be
referred immediately to the association by the liquidator for
processing as provided in this chapter.
(5) "Cybersecurity insurance" means first and third party
coverage in a policy or endorsement written on a direct,
admitted basis for losses and loss mitigation arising out of or
relating to:
(A) data privacy breaches;
(B) unauthorized information network security intrusions;
(C) computer viruses;
(D) ransomware;
(E) cyber extortion;
(F) identity theft; and
(G) similar exposures.
(5) (6) The term "high net worth insured" means the following:
(A) For purposes of section 11.5(a) of this chapter, an insured
that has a net worth (including the aggregate net worth of the
insured and all subsidiaries and affiliates of the insured,
calculated on a consolidated basis) that exceeds twenty-five
million dollars ($25,000,000) on December 31 of the year
immediately preceding the year in which the insurer becomes
an insolvent insurer.
(B) For purposes of section 11.5(b) of this chapter, an insured
that has a net worth (including the aggregate net worth of the
insured and all subsidiaries and affiliates of the insured,
HEA 1260 — Concur

12
calculated on a consolidated basis) that exceeds fifty million
dollars ($50,000,000) on December 31 of the year immediately
preceding the year in which the insurer becomes an insolvent
insurer.
(6) (7) The term "insolvent insurer" means (a) a member insurer
holding a valid certificate of authority to transact insurance in this
state either at the time the policy was issued or when the insured
event occurred and (b) against whom a final order of liquidation,
with a finding of insolvency, to which there is no further right of
appeal, has been entered by a court of competent jurisdiction in
the company's state of domicile. "Insolvent insurer" shall not be
construed to mean an insurer with respect to which an order,
decree, judgment or finding of insolvency whether preliminary or
temporary in nature or order to rehabilitation or conservation has
been issued by any court of competent jurisdiction prior to
January 1, 1972 or which is adjudicated to have been insolvent
prior to that date.
(8) The term "insured" means any named insured, any
additional insured, any vendor, lessor, or any other party
identified as an insured under the policy.
(7) (9) The term "member insurer" means any person who is
licensed or holds a certificate of authority under IC 27-1-6-18 or
IC 27-1-17-1 to transact in Indiana any kind of insurance for
which coverage is provided under section 3 of this chapter,
including the exchange of reciprocal or inter-insurance contracts.
The term includes any insurer whose license or certificate of
authority to transact such insurance in Indiana may have been
suspended, revoked, not renewed, or voluntarily surrendered. A
"member insurer" does not include farm mutual insurance
companies organized and operating pursuant to IC 27-5.1 other
than a company to which IC 27-5.1-2-6 applies.
(8) (10) The term "net direct written premiums" means direct
gross premiums written in this state on insurance policies to
which this chapter applies, less return premiums thereon and
dividends paid or credited to policyholders on such direct
business. "Net direct premiums written" does not include
premiums on contracts between insurers or reinsurers.
(9) (11) The term "person" means an individual, an aggregation
of individuals, a corporation, a partnership, or another entity.
(12) The term "receiver" means liquidator, rehabilitator,
conservator, or ancillary receiver, as the context requires.
(13) The term "self-insurer" means a person who covers the
HEA 1260 — Concur

13
person's liability through a qualified individual or group
self-insurance program or any other formal program created
for the specific purpose of covering liabilities typically
covered by insurance.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, an
insurance policy that is issued by a member insurer and later allocated,
transferred, assumed by, or otherwise made the sole responsibility of
another insurer, pursuant to a state statute providing for the division of
an insurance company or the statutory assumption or transfer of
designated policies and under which there is no remaining obligation
to the transferring entity, shall be considered to have been issued by a
member insurer which is an insolvent insurer for the purposes of this
chapter in the event that the insurer to which the policy has been
allocated, transferred, assumed by, or otherwise made the sole
responsibility of is placed in liquidation.
(c) An insurance policy that was issued by a nonmember insurer and
later allocated, transferred, assumed by, or otherwise made the sole
responsibility of a member insurer under a state statute shall not be
considered to have been issued by a member insurer for the purposes
of this chapter.
SECTION 13. IC 27-6-8-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.158-2024,
SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. There is created a nonprofit unincorporated
legal entity to be known as the Indiana Insurance Guaranty Association
(referred to in this chapter as the "association"). All insurers defined as
member insurers in section 4(a)(7) 4(a)(9) of this chapter shall be and
remain members of the association as a condition of their authority to
transact insurance in this state. The association shall perform its
functions under a plan of operation established and approved under
section 8 of this chapter and shall exercise its powers through a board
of directors established under section 6 of this chapter. For purposes of
administration and assessment, the association shall be divided into
three (3) separate accounts:
(1) The worker's compensation insurance account.
(2) The automobile insurance account.
(3) The account for all other insurance to which this chapter
applies.
SECTION 14. IC 27-6-8-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.52-2013,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The association shall do all of the following:
(1) Be obligated to pay covered claims existing before the order
of liquidation, or arising within thirty (30) days after the order of
HEA 1260 — Concur

14
liquidation, or before the policy expiration date if less than thirty
(30) days after the order of liquidation, or before the insured
replaces the policy or causes its cancellation, if the insured does
so within thirty (30) days of the order of liquidation. The
obligation shall be satisfied by paying to the claimant an amount
as follows:
(A) The full amount of a covered claim for benefits under
worker's compensation insurance.
(B) With respect to a claim for the return of unearned
premium, the lesser of: an amount not exceeding ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) per policy for a covered claim
for the return of unearned premium, but the obligation
shall include only the amount of each covered claim that is
in excess of fifty dollars ($50).
(i) eighty percent (80%) of the paid but unearned premium;
or
(ii) six hundred fifty dollars ($650) multiplied by the
number of months or partial months remaining in the policy
term, not to exceed twelve (12) months.
(C) An amount not to exceed three hundred thousand dollars
($300,000) per covered claim. For purposes of this clause, all
claims of any kind that arise out of or are related to the bodily
injury to or death of one (1) person constitute a single claim,
regardless of the number of claims made or the number of
claimants.
(D) In no event shall the association be obligated to pay an
amount in excess of three hundred thousand dollars
($300,000) for all first and third party claims under a
policy or endorsement providing, or that is found to
provide, cybersecurity insurance coverage and arising out
of or related to a single insured event, regardless of the
number of claims made or the number of claimants.
The association is not, in any event, obligated to pay a claimant
any amount in excess of the obligation of the insolvent insurer
under the policy or coverage from which the claim arises.
Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, a
covered claim may not include a claim filed with the guaranty
fund after the final date set by the court for the filing of
claims against the liquidator or receiver of an insolvent
insurer.
In the case of a claim for wrongful death, the foregoing obligation
of the association shall, in addition to the limits set forth above,
HEA 1260 — Concur

15
be subject to the limitations provided by the wrongful death
statutes of the state. Such amounts which are legally payable
because of the death of a claimant shall be paid to the claimant's
estate, to the claimant's father or mother or guardian, to the
surviving spouse or children, or to the next of kin as set out in
IC 34-23-1 and IC 34-23-2.
The amount for which the association shall be obligated may also
include payments in fact made to others, not members of
claimant's household, which were reasonably incurred to obtain
from such other persons ordinary and necessary services for the
production of income in lieu of those services the claimant would
have performed for the claimant had the claimant not been
injured.
In the case of claims arising from bodily injury, sickness, or
disease, including those in which death results, under IC 22-3 or
similar state or federal laws providing benefits for occupational
injury or disease, the association is obligated only to the extent
provided under IC 22-3.
A third party having a covered claim against any insured of an
insolvent member insurer may file such claim in the liquidation
proceeding under IC 27-9-3 if such insolvent member insurer is
a domestic insurer and pursuant to the applicable provisions of
law of the state of domicile if such insolvent member insurer is
not a domestic insurer. The liquidator shall immediately refer said
claim to the association to process as provided in this chapter
unless the claimant shall within thirty (30) days from the date of
filing said claim in the liquidation proceeding, file with the
commissioner as liquidator a written demand that said claim be
processed in liquidation proceedings as a claim not covered by
this chapter.
(2) Be deemed the insurer to the extent of its obligation on the
covered claims as limited by this chapter and to this extent shall
have all rights, duties, and obligations of the insolvent insurer as
if the insurer had not become insolvent, including those relating
to reinsurance contracts and treaties entered into by the insolvent
insurer. However, the association's obligation to defend any
insured of the insolvent insurer or to indemnity indemnify against
the costs of such defense terminates as soon as the claimant or
claimants have been paid all benefits that they are entitled to
under this chapter.
(3) Allocate claims paid and expenses incurred among the three
(3) accounts separately, and assess member insurers separately for
HEA 1260 — Concur

16
each account amounts necessary to pay the obligation of the
association under subdivision (1) subsequent to an insolvency, the
expenses of handling covered claims subsequent to an insolvency,
the cost of examination under IC 27-6-8-12 and other expenses
authorized by this chapter. There are two (2) classes of
assessments as follows:
(A) Class A assessments are assessments that are
authorized and called by the board for the purpose of
meeting administrative and legal costs and other expenses.
Class A assessments may be authorized and called whether
or not related to a particular impaired insurer or insolvent
insurer.
(B) Class B assessments are assessments that are
authorized and called by the board to the extent necessary
to carry out the powers and duties of the association under
this chapter with regard to an impaired insurer or
insolvent insurer.
The amount of a Class A assessment must be determined by
the board and may be authorized and called on a pro rata or
non-pro rata basis. If pro rata, the board may provide that
the assessment be credited against future Class B assessments.
The amount of a Class B assessment assessments of each
member insurer shall be on a uniform percentage basis in the
proportion that the net direct written premiums in this state of the
member insurer for the preceding calendar year on the kinds of
insurance in the account bears to the net direct written premiums
of all member insurers for the preceding calendar year on the
kinds of insurance in the account. However, in addition to the pro
rata assessments already described, an assessment may be made
against each member insurer in a stated amount up to fifty dollars
($50) per year for the purpose of paying the administrative
expenses of the association. There shall be no Class B assessment
for any account so long as assets held in such account are
sufficient to cover all estimated payments for liquidation in
process under such account. Each member insurer shall be
notified of the assessment not later than thirty (30) days before it
is due. No member insurer may be assessed in any year on any
account an amount greater than one percent (1%) of that member
insurer's net direct written premiums in this state for the
preceding calendar year on the kinds of insurance in the account.
If the maximum assessment, together with the other assets of the
association in any account, does not provide in any one (1) year
HEA 1260 — Concur

17
in any account an amount sufficient to make all necessary
payments from that account, the funds available shall be prorated
and the unpaid portion shall be paid as soon thereafter as funds
become available. The association may exempt or defer, in whole
or in part, the assessment of any member insurer, if the
assessment would cause the member insurer's financial statement
to reflect amounts of capital or surplus less than the minimum
amounts required for a certificate of authority by any jurisdiction
in which the member insurer is authorized to transact insurance.
However, during the period of deferment no dividends shall be
paid to shareholders or policyholders by a company whose
assessment has been deferred. A deferred assessment shall be
paid when such payment will not reduce capital or surplus below
required minimums. Such payments shall be refunded to those
companies whose assessments were increased as the result of
such deferment, or at the option of any such company, shall be
credited to future assessments against such company.
(4) Investigate, adjust, compromise, settle, and pay covered
claims to the extent of the association's obligation and deny all
other claims and may review settlements, releases, and judgments
to which the insolvent insurer or its insured were parties to
determine the extent to which such settlements, releases, and
judgments may be properly contested, and as appropriate to
contest them. The association shall pay claims in any order
that it may deem reasonable, including the payment of claims
as they are received from the claimants or in groups or
categories of claims. The association shall have the right to
appoint and to direct legal counsel retained under liability
insurance policies for the defense of covered claims and to
appoint and direct other service providers for covered
services.
(5) Notify such persons as the commissioner directs under
IC 27-6-8-9(b)(i).
(6) Handle claims through its employees or through one (1) or
more insurers or other persons designated as servicing facilities.
Designation of a servicing facility is subject to the approval of the
commissioner, but such designation may be declined by a member
insurer.
(7) Reimburse each servicing facility for obligations of the
association paid by the facility and for expenses incurred by the
facility while handling claims on behalf of the association and
shall pay the other expenses of the association authorized by this
HEA 1260 — Concur

18
chapter. Any unreimbursed obligation of the association to a
member insurer designated a servicing facility shall constitute an
admitted asset of such member insurer.
(8) Be entitled to and permitted to examine all claims, files, and
records of an insolvent insurer at such times and to such extent as
necessary or appropriate to obtain information regarding covered
claims individually and in the aggregate, and to establish such
procedures as appropriate to obtain prompt notice of all covered
claims and information pertaining thereto during the course of
liquidation.
(9) Have the right to review and contest, as set forth in this
subsection, settlements, releases, compromises, waivers, and
judgments to which the insolvent insurer or its insureds were
parties before the entry of the order of liquidation. In an
action to enforce settlements, releases, and judgments to
which the insolvent insurer or its insureds were parties before
the entry of the order of liquidation, the association shall have
the right to assert the following defenses, in addition to the
defenses available to the insurer:
(A) The association is not bound by a settlement, release,
compromise, or waiver executed by an insured or the
insurer or any judgment entered against an insured or the
insurer by consent or through a failure to exhaust all
appeals, if the settlement, release, compromise, waiver, or
judgment was:
(i) executed or entered within one hundred twenty (120)
days before the entry of an order of liquidation and the
insured or insurer did not use reasonable care in
entering into the settlement, release, compromise,
waiver, or judgment or did not pursue all reasonable
appeals of an adverse judgment; or
(ii) executed by or taken against an insured or the
insurer based on default, fraud, collusion, or the
insurer's failure to defend.
(B) If a court of competent jurisdiction finds that the
association is not bound by a settlement, release,
compromise, waiver, or judgment for the reasons
described in clause (A), the settlement, release,
compromise, waiver, or judgment shall be set aside and the
association shall be permitted to defend any covered claim
on the merits. The settlement, release, compromise, waiver,
or judgment may not be considered as evidence of liability
HEA 1260 — Concur

19
or damages in connection with any claim brought against
the association or any other party under this chapter.
(C) The association shall have the right to assert any
statutory defenses or rights of offset against any
settlement, release, compromise, or waiver executed by an
insured or the insurer or any judgment taken against the
insured or the insurer.
(10) As to any covered claims arising from a judgment under
any decision, verdict, or finding based on the default of the
insolvent insurer or its failure to defend, the association,
either on its own behalf or on behalf of an insured, may apply
to have the judgment, order, decision, verdict, or finding set
aside by the same court or administrator that entered the
judgment, order, decision, verdict, or finding and shall be
permitted to defend the claim on the merits.
(b) The association may do the following:
(1) Appear in, defend, and appeal any action on a covered claim,
but the association shall have no obligation to pay any amount in
excess of the provisions of IC 27-6-8-7.
(2) Employ or retain such persons as are necessary to handle
claims and perform other duties of the association.
(3) Borrow funds necessary to effect the purposes of this chapter
in accord with the plan of operation.
(4) Sue or be sued.
(5) Negotiate and become a party to any contracts as are
necessary to carry out the purpose of this chapter.
(6) Perform such other acts as are necessary or proper to
effectuate the purpose of this chapter.
(7) Refund to the then member insurers in proportion to the
contribution of each such member insurer to that account that
amount by which the assets of the account exceed the liabilities
if, at the end of the calendar year, the board of directors finds that
the assets of the association in any account exceed the liabilities
of that account as estimated by the board of directors for the
coming year, provided that the association may retain as a reserve
fund from the excess of the assets over liabilities at the end of any
calendar year an amount not to exceed ten percent (10%) of such
excess assets of such account. Any such reserve fund or earnings
from its investment shall be used only for the payment of covered
claims and authorized association expenses. Upon appropriate
action by the board of directors such reserve fund shall be
refunded to the then member insurers in proportion to the total
HEA 1260 — Concur

20
contribution of each such member insurer to such account.
(c) The following apply with respect to an action involving the
association:
(1) Except for an action by the receiver, an action related to or
arising out of this chapter against the association must be brought
in an Indiana court.
(2) Indiana courts have exclusive jurisdiction over all actions
against the association related to or arising out of this chapter.
(3) The exclusive venue for an action by or against the association
is in the Marion County Circuit Court, Marion County, Indiana.
However, the association may waive this venue for a particular
action.
SECTION 15. IC 27-6-8-9 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) The
commissioner shall:
(i) Notify the association of the existence of an insolvent insurer
not later than three (3) working days after the commissioner
receives an order of liquidation.
(ii) Upon request of the board of directors, provide the association
with a statement of the net direct written premiums of each
member insurer.
(b) The commissioner may:
(i) Require that the association notify the insureds of the insolvent
insurer and any other interested parties of the order of liquidation
and of their rights under this chapter. This notification shall be by
mail at their last known address, where available, but if sufficient
information for notification by mail is not available, notice by
publication in a newspaper of general circulation in all counties
in which the insolvent insurer transacted insurance business shall
be sufficient.
(ii) Require each insurance producer of the insolvent insurer to
give prompt written notice by first class mail of such insolvency
and the rights of the insured under this chapter to each insured of
the insolvent insurer for whom the insurance producer is
insurance producer of record, at such insured's last known
address.
(iii) Suspend or revoke, after notice and hearing, the certificate of
authority to transact insurance in this state of any member insurer
which fails to pay an assessment when due or fails to comply with
the plan of operation. As an alternative, the commissioner may
levy a fine on any member insurer which fails to pay an
assessment when due. The fine shall not exceed five percent (5%)
HEA 1260 — Concur

21
of the unpaid assessment per month, except that no fine shall be
less than one hundred dollars ($100) per month.
(iv) Revoke the designation of any servicing facility if the
commissioner finds claims are being handled unsatisfactorily.
(v) Any final action or order of the commissioner under this
chapter shall be subject to judicial review in a court of competent
jurisdiction.
(c) If the commissioner determines that any member insurer
may be subject to a future delinquency proceeding under IC 27-9,
the commissioner may do the following to assist in the performance
of the commissioner's duties:
(1) Share confidential and privileged documents, material, or
information reported under an enterprise risk filing with the
association regarding the member insurer.
(2) Share confidential and privileged documents, material, the
contents of an examination report, a preliminary examination
report or its results, or any matter relating thereto, including
working papers, recorded information, documents, and copies
thereof produced by, obtained by, or disclosed to the
commissioner or to any other person in the course of any
examination with the association regarding the member
insurer.
(3) Disclose the information described in this subsection to the
association so long as the association agrees in writing to hold
the information confidential in a manner consistent with this
chapter and uses the information to prepare for the possible
liquidation of the member insurer. Access to the information
disclosed by the commissioner to the association under this
subsection shall be limited to the association's staff and its
counsel. The board of directors of the association may have
access to the information disclosed by the commissioner to the
association once the member insurer is subject to a
delinquency proceeding under IC 27-9, subject to any terms
and conditions established by the commissioner.
(4) Disclose the information described in this subsection with
associations in other states and with any organization of one
(1) or more state associations of similar purposes so long as
the recipient of the information agrees in writing to hold the
information confidential in a manner consistent with this
chapter and uses the information to prepare for the possible
liquidation of the member insurer. Access to the information
disclosed by the commissioner under this subsection shall be
HEA 1260 — Concur

22
limited to the association's staff and its counsel. The board of
directors of the association may have access to the
information disclosed by the commissioner to the association
once the member insurer is subject to a delinquency
proceeding under IC 27-9, subject to any terms and conditions
established by the commissioner.
(5) If the commissioner determines that a liquidation is likely,
the commissioner may cooperate with the association and
with any organization of one (1) or more state associations of
similar purposes to provide for an orderly transition to
liquidation to minimize any delay in the handling and
payment of claims.
SECTION 16. IC 27-6-8-11.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.158-2024,
SECTION 22, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.5. (a) The association is not obligated to pay
a first party claim by a high net worth insured described in section
4(a)(5)(A) 4(a)(6)(A) of this chapter.
(b) The association has the right to recover from a high net worth
insured described in section 4(a)(5)(B) 4(a)(6)(B) of this chapter all
amounts paid by the association to or on behalf of the high net worth
insured, regardless of whether the amounts were paid for indemnity,
defense, or otherwise.
(c) The association is not obligated to pay a claim that:
(1) would otherwise be a covered claim;
(2) is an obligation to or on behalf of a person who has a net
worth greater than the net worth allowed by the insurance
guaranty association law of the state of residence of the claimant
at the time specified by the applicable law of the state of
residence of the claimant; and
(3) has been denied by the association of the state of residence of
the claimant on the basis described in subdivision (2).
(d) The association may also, at its sole discretion and without
assumption of any ongoing duty to do so, pay any third party
claims or cybersecurity insurance obligations covered by a policy
or endorsement of an insolvent company on behalf of a high net
worth insured. In that case, the association shall recover from the
high net worth insured under this section all amounts paid on its
behalf, all allocated claim adjusted expenses relating to the claims,
the association's attorney's fees, and all court costs in any action
necessary to collect the full amount to the association's
reimbursement under this section.
(d) (e) The association shall establish reasonable procedures,
HEA 1260 — Concur

23
subject to the approval of the commissioner, for requesting financial
information from insureds:
(1) on a confidential basis; and
(2) in the application of this section.
(e) (f) The procedures established under subsection (d) (e) must
provide for sharing of the financial information obtained from insureds
with:
(1) any other association that is similar to the association; and
(2) the liquidator for an insolvent insurer;
on the same confidential basis.
(f) (g) If an insured refuses to provide financial information that is:
(1) requested under the procedures established under subsection
(d); (e); and
(2) available;
the association may, until the time that the financial information is
provided to the association, consider the insured to be a high net worth
insured for purposes of subsections (a) and (b).
(g) (h) In an action contesting the applicability of this section to an
insured that refuses to provide financial information under the
procedures established under subsection (d), (e), the insured bears the
burden of proof concerning the insured's net worth at the relevant time.
If the insured fails to prove that the insured's net worth at the relevant
time was less than the applicable amount set forth in section 4(a)(5)(A)
4(a)(6)(A) or 4(a)(5)(B) 4(a)(6)(B) of this chapter, the court shall
award to the association the association's full costs, expenses, and
reasonable attorney's fees incurred in contesting the claim.
SECTION 17. IC 27-6-8-20 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) The association may join one (1) or more
organizations of other state associations of similar purposes to
further the purposes and administer the powers and duties of the
association. The association may designate one (1) or more of these
organizations to:
(1) act as a liaison for the association; and
(2) to the extent the association authorizes, bind the
association in agreements or settlements with receivers of
insolvent insurance companies or their designated
representatives.
(b) The association, in cooperation with other obligated or
potentially obligated guaranty associations or their designated
representatives, shall make all reasonable efforts to coordinate and
cooperate with receivers or their designated representatives in the
HEA 1260 — Concur

24
most efficient and uniform manner, including the use of Uniform
Data Standards as promulgated or approved by the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners.
SECTION 18. IC 27-7-5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.130-2020,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Except as provided in subsections (d), (f),
and (h), the insurer shall make available, in each automobile liability
or motor vehicle liability policy of insurance which is delivered or
issued for delivery in this state with respect to any motor vehicle
registered or principally garaged in this state, insuring against loss
resulting from liability imposed by law for bodily injury or death
suffered by any person and for injury to or destruction of property to
others arising from the ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor
vehicle, or in a supplement to such a policy, the following types of
coverage:
(1) in limits for bodily injury or death and for injury to or
destruction of property not less than those set forth in IC 9-25-4-5
under policy provisions approved by the commissioner of
insurance, for the protection of persons insured under the policy
who are legally entitled to recover damages from owners or
operators of uninsured or underinsured motor vehicles because of
bodily injury, sickness or disease, including death, and for the
protection of persons insured under the policy who are legally
entitled to recover damages from owners or operators of
uninsured motor vehicles for injury to or destruction of property
resulting therefrom; or
(2) in limits for bodily injury or death not less than those set forth
in IC 9-25-4-5 under policy provisions approved by the
commissioner of insurance, for the protection of persons insured
under the policy provisions who are legally entitled to recover
damages from owners or operators of uninsured or underinsured
motor vehicles because of bodily injury, sickness or disease,
including death resulting therefrom.
The uninsured and underinsured motorist coverages must be provided
by insurers for either a single premium or for separate premiums, in
limits at least equal to the limits of liability specified in the bodily
injury liability provisions of an insured's policy, unless such coverages
have been rejected in writing by the insured. However, underinsured
motorist coverage must be made available in limits of not less than fifty
thousand dollars ($50,000). At the insurer's option, the bodily injury
liability provisions of the insured's policy may be required to be equal
to the insured's underinsured motorist coverage. Insurers may not sell
HEA 1260 — Concur

25
or provide underinsured motorist coverage in an amount less than fifty
thousand dollars ($50,000). Insurers must make underinsured motorist
coverage available to all existing policyholders on the date of the first
renewal of existing policies that occurs on or after January 1, 1995, and
on any policies newly issued or delivered on or after January 1, 1995.
Uninsured motorist coverage or underinsured motorist coverage may
be offered by an insurer in an amount exceeding the limits of liability
specified in the bodily injury and property damage liability provisions
of the insured's policy.
(b) A named insured of an automobile or motor vehicle liability
policy has the right, in writing, to:
(1) reject both the uninsured motorist coverage and the
underinsured motorist coverage provided for in this section; or
(2) reject either the uninsured motorist coverage alone or the
underinsured motorist coverage alone, if the insurer provides the
coverage not rejected separately from the coverage rejected.
A rejection of coverage under this subsection by a named insured is a
rejection on behalf of all other named insureds, all other insureds, and
all other persons entitled to coverage under the policy. No insured may
have uninsured motorist property damage liability insurance coverage
under this section unless the insured also has uninsured motorist bodily
injury liability insurance coverage under this section. Following
rejection of either or both uninsured motorist coverage or underinsured
motorist coverage, unless later requested in writing, the insurer need
not offer uninsured motorist coverage or underinsured motorist
coverage in or supplemental to a renewal or replacement policy issued
to the same insured by the same insurer or a subsidiary or an affiliate
of the originally issuing insurer. Renewals of policies issued or
delivered in this state which have undergone interim policy
endorsement or amendment do not constitute newly issued or delivered
policies for which the insurer is required to provide the coverages
described in this section.
(c) A rejection under subsection (b) must specify:
(1) that the named insured is rejecting:
(A) the uninsured motorist coverage;
(B) the underinsured motorist coverage; or
(C) both the uninsured motorist coverage and the underinsured
motorist coverage;
that would otherwise be provided under the policy; and
(2) the date on which the rejection is effective.
(d) The following apply to the coverage described in subsection (a)
in connection with a commercial umbrella or excess liability policy,
HEA 1260 — Concur

26
including a commercial umbrella or excess liability policy that is issued
or delivered to a motor carrier (as defined in IC 8-2.1-17-10) that is in
compliance with the minimum levels of financial responsibility set
forth in 49 CFR Part 387:
(1) An insurer is not required to make available in a commercial
umbrella or excess liability policy the coverage described in
subsection (a).
(2) An insurer that, through a rider or an endorsement, reduces or
removes from a commercial umbrella or excess liability policy the
coverage described in subsection (a) shall:
(A) through the United States mail; or
(B) by electronic means;
provide to the named insured written notice of the reduction or
removal.
(3) An insurer that makes available in a commercial umbrella or
excess liability policy the coverage described in subsection (a):
(A) may make available the coverage in limits determined by
the insurer; and
(B) is not required to make available the coverage in limits
equal to the limits specified in the commercial umbrella or
excess liability policy.
(e) A rejection under subsection (b) of uninsured motorist coverage
or underinsured motorist coverage in an underlying commercial policy
of insurance is also a rejection of uninsured motorist coverage or
underinsured motorist coverage in a commercial umbrella or excess
liability policy.
(f) An insurer is not required to make available the coverage
described in subsection (a) in connection with coverage that:
(1) is related to or included in a commercial policy of property
and casualty insurance described in Class 2 or Class 3 of
IC 27-1-5-1; and
(2) covers a loss related to a motor vehicle:
(A) of which the insured is not the owner; and
(B) that is used:
(i) by the insured or an agent of the insured; and
(ii) for purposes authorized by the insured.
(g) For purposes of subsection (f), "owner" means:
(1) a person who holds the legal title to a motor vehicle;
(2) a person who rents or leases a motor vehicle and has exclusive
use of the motor vehicle for more than thirty (30) days;
(3) the conditional vendee or lessee under an agreement for the
conditional sale or lease of a motor vehicle; or
HEA 1260 — Concur

27
(4) the mortgagor under an agreement for the conditional sale or
lease of a motor vehicle under which the mortgagor has:
(A) the right to purchase; and
(B) an immediate right of possession of;
the motor vehicle upon the performance of the conditions stated
in the agreement.
(h) The following apply to the coverage described in subsection (a)
in relation to a personal umbrella or excess liability policy:
(1) An insurer is not required to make available the coverage
described in subsection (a) under a personal umbrella or excess
liability policy.
(2) An insurer that reduces or removes, through a rider or an
endorsement, coverage described in subsection (a) under a
personal umbrella or excess liability policy shall:
(A) through the United States mail; or
(B) by electronic means;
provide to the named insured written notice of the reduction or
removal.
(3) An insurer that makes available the coverage described in
subsection (a) under a personal umbrella or excess liability
policy:
(A) may make available the coverage in limits determined by
the insurer; and
(B) is not required to make available the coverage in limits
equal to the limits specified in the personal umbrella or excess
liability policy.
(4) A rejection under subsection (b) of uninsured motorist
coverage or underinsured motorist coverage in an underlying
personal policy of insurance is also a rejection of uninsured
motorist coverage or underinsured motorist coverage in a personal
umbrella or excess liability policy.
(i) A policy of insurance that provides coverage in excess of any
liability relating to a self-insured retention amount shall be
considered a commercial umbrella or excess liability policy under
subsection (d).
SECTION 19. IC 27-7-6-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. Section 6 of this chapter, as amended in the 2026
session of the general assembly, applies to automobile insurance
policies that are issued, delivered, amended, or renewed on or after
January 1, 2027.
SECTION 20. IC 27-7-6-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.196-2021,
HEA 1260 — Concur

28
SECTION 36, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) An insurer shall not fail to renew a policy
unless it mails to the named insured, at the address shown in the policy,
at least twenty (20) thirty (30) days advance notice of its intention not
to renew the policy.
(b) If a policy was procured by an independent insurance producer
duly licensed by the state of Indiana, a notice of intent not to renew the
policy shall be mailed to the independent insurance producer at least
ten (10) days prior to the mailing of the notice of intention not to renew
to the named insured under subsection (a), unless such notice of intent
is or has been waived in writing by the independent insurance
producer.
(c) This section does not apply:
(1) if the insurer has manifested its willingness to renew; or
(2) in case of nonpayment of premium.
However, notwithstanding the failure of an insurer to comply with this
section, the policy shall terminate on the effective date of any other
insurance policy with respect to any automobile designated in both
policies.
(d) A notice of intention not to renew is not required under this
section if:
(1) the insured is transferred from an insurer to an affiliate of the
insurer for future coverage; and
(2) the transfer results in the same or broader coverage.
(e) Renewal of a policy shall not constitute a waiver or estoppel with
respect to grounds for cancellation which existed before the effective
date of such renewal.
SECTION 21. IC 27-7-12-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as
provided in subsection (b), this chapter applies to policies of
insurance covering risks to property located in Indiana that take effect
or are renewed after June 30, 2001, and that insure loss of or damage
to:
(1) real property consisting of not more than four (4) residential
units, one (1) of which is the principal place of residence of the
named insured; or
(2) personal property:
(A) in which the named insured has an insurable interest; and
(B) that is used within a residential dwelling for personal,
family, or household purposes.
(b) Section 4 of this chapter, as amended in the 2026 session of
the general assembly, and section 6.5 of this chapter, as added in
HEA 1260 — Concur

29
the 2026 session of the general assembly, apply to policies of
insurance described in subsection (a) that are issued, delivered,
amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027.
(b) (c) This chapter does not apply to the following:
(1) A policy of inland marine insurance.
(2) The cancellation or nonrenewal of an automobile insurance
policy under IC 27-7-6.
(3) The cancellation or nonrenewal of a commercial property and
casualty insurance policy under IC 27-1-31-2.5.
SECTION 22. IC 27-7-12-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) As used in this
chapter, "aerial image" means an image of a named insured's
property captured from an airborne platform.
(a) (b) As used in this chapter, "cancellation" refers to a termination
of property insurance coverage that occurs during the policy term.
(b) (c) As used in this chapter, "nonpayment of premium" means the
failure of the named insured to discharge any obligation in connection
with the payment of premiums on policies of insurance subject to this
chapter, regardless of whether the payments are directly payable to the
insurer or its agent or indirectly payable under a premium finance plan
or extension of credit. The term includes the failure to pay dues or fees
where payment of the dues or fees is a prerequisite to obtaining or
continuing property insurance coverage.
(c) (d) As used in this chapter, "nonrenewal" or "nonrenewed" refers
to a termination of property insurance coverage that occurs at the end
of the policy term.
(d) (e) As used in this chapter, "renewal" or "to renew" refers to:
(1) the issuance and delivery by an insurer at the end of a policy
period of a policy superseding a policy previously issued and
delivered by the same insurer; or
(2) the issuance and delivery of a certificate or notice extending
the term of an existing policy beyond its policy period or term.
(e) (f) As used in this chapter, "termination" means a cancellation
or nonrenewal. The term does not include:
(1) the requirement of a reasonable deductible;
(2) reasonable changes in the amount of insurance; or
(3) reasonable reductions in policy limits or coverage;
if the requirements or changes are directly related to the hazard
involved and are made on the renewal date for the policy. The term
does not include a transfer of a policy to another insurer.
SECTION 23. IC 27-7-12-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.196-2021,
SECTION 38, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
HEA 1260 — Concur

30
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Notice of nonrenewal by an insurer must:
(1) be in writing;
(2) be mailed to the named insured at the last known address of
the named insured;
(3) state the insurer's intention not to renew the policy upon
expiration of the current policy period;
(4) upon request of the named insured, be accompanied by a
written explanation of the specific reasons for the nonrenewal;
and
(5) be mailed to the named insured at least twenty (20) sixty (60)
days before the expiration of the current policy period; and
(6) comply with section 6.5(a)(1) of this chapter if the insurer
used aerial images as the sole reason for nonrenewing a
policy.
(b) If the policy was procured by an independent insurance producer
licensed in Indiana, the insurer shall mail notice of nonrenewal to the
insurance producer not less than ten (10) days before the insurer mails
the notice to the named insured under subsection (a), unless the
obligation to notify the insurance producer is waived in writing by the
insurance producer.
(c) Notice of nonrenewal under this section is not required if:
(1) the named insured is transferred from an insurer to an affiliate
of the insurer for future coverage; and
(2) the transfer results in the same or broader coverage.
(d) If an insurer mails to an insured a renewal notice, bill,
certificate, or policy indicating the insurer's willingness to renew a
policy and the insured does not respond, the insurer is not required to
mail to the insured notice of intention not to renew.
SECTION 24. IC 27-7-12-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. (a) When utilizing aerial
images as the sole reason for nonrenewing a policy, an insurer shall
do the following:
(1) Ensure that the nonrenewal notice sent to the named
insured under section 4 of this chapter includes information
about how the named insured can request to review copies of
the images of the property that were used to make the
decision. Photos must have been taken within the past
twenty-four (24) months.
(2) Establish a point of contact and a process for a named
insured to use to provide documentation of completion of the
required work that the insurer communicates to the named
HEA 1260 — Concur

31
insured under subdivision (1). The documentation must be
used by the insurer in considering whether to uphold or
reverse the nonrenewal.
(3) Establish an appeal process that allows the named insured
to correct any errors or misunderstandings related to the
nonrenewal.
(4) Provide the named insured at least sixty (60) days to cure
the defects or conditions underlying a nonrenewal after the
date the insurer identifies the specific conditions under
subdivision (1). An insurer shall have the right to assess the
work used to cure the defects or conditions to ensure they
have been corrected in a manner that meets the standards
originally communicated by the insurer under subdivision (1).
(5) Offer a renewal policy to a named insured who submits
proof that they have cured the defects or conditions identified
under subdivision (1). However, an insurer may nonrenew the
policy only for a reason unrelated to the defects or conditions
identified under subdivision (1).
(b) The department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
effectuate the provisions of this section.
SECTION 25. IC 27-7-18.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 18.7. Property and Casualty Insurance for
Condominium Units
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "condominium" has the meaning
set forth in IC 32-25-2-7.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "condominium unit" has the
meaning set forth in IC 32-25-2-9.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "co-owner" has the meaning set
forth in IC 32-25-2-11.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "property and casualty
insurance" means one (1) or more of the types of insurance
described in IC 27-1-5-1, Class 2 and Class 3.
Sec. 5. (a) This section applies to a condominium in which all of
the condominium units:
(1) were designed and built for occupancy by not more than
two (2) separate families; and
(2) contain not more than two (2) separate living quarters.
(b) Notwithstanding IC 32-25-8-9, the co-owners of a
condominium described in subsection (a) may obtain property and
casualty insurance coverage for the condominium units through
HEA 1260 — Concur

32
one (1) of the following methods:
(1) By purchasing a master policy for property and casualty
insurance.
(2) By allowing each co-owner to purchase property and
casualty insurance on an individual basis.
(c) This section may not be construed to relieve the co-owners
from any obligation under IC 32-25-8-9 to provide insurance
coverage under a master policy for:
(1) the land on which the condominium is located;
(2) swimming pools and other recreational facilities; or
(3) any other parts of the condominium existing for common
use.
SECTION 26. IC 27-8-11-8.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. (a) As used in this section,
"insurance producer" has the meaning set forth in IC 27-1-15.6-2.
(b) An insurer shall provide any insurance producer who has
contracted with the insurer with access to a complete list of every
provider that has entered into an agreement with an insurer under
section 3 of this chapter.
(c) An insurer shall make the information described in
subsection (b) available on the insurer's portal for insurance
producer communications.
SECTION 27. IC 27-8-13-9.3, AS ADDED BY P.L.56-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 9.3. (a) Except as provided in subsection
(b), this section applies to a Medicare supplement policy or certificate
delivered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026.
(b) The amendments made to this section in the 2026 session of
the general assembly apply to a Medicare supplement policy or
certificate delivered, issued, or renewed on or after March 15,
2026.
(b) (c) This section applies to:
(1) an applicant who submits an application for a Medicare
supplement policy or certificate before or during the six (6) month
period beginning on the first day of the first month during which
the applicant is:
(A) at least sixty-five (65) years of age; and
(B) timely enrolled for benefits under Medicare Part B without
penalty under federal law; and
(2) an applicant who:
(A) is at least sixty-five (65) years of age;
HEA 1260 — Concur

33
(B) is insured under a Medicare supplement policy or
certificate;
(C) submits an application for a Medicare supplement policy
or certificate:
(i) to an issuer that is different than the issuer of the
applicant's current Medicare supplement policy or
certificate; and
(ii) within sixty (60) days of during the period beginning
one (1) month before the applicant's birthday and ending
one (1) month after the applicant's birthday; and
(D) seeks to maintain the same type of lettered Medicare
supplement plan, including any variation of the lettered plan.
(c) (d) An issuer of a Medicare supplement policy or certificate
shall not deny, condition the issuance or effectiveness of, or
discriminate in the pricing of a Medicare supplement policy or
certificate because of the health status, claims experience, receipt of
health care, or medical condition of an applicant to which subsection
(b) (c) applies.
(d) (e) A new Medicare supplement policy or certificate issued to an
applicant under subsection (b)(2) (c)(2) must go into effect on the first
day of the next month that is at least thirty (30) days after the signature
date on the application for the Medicare supplement policy or
certificate.
SECTION 28. IC 27-13-9-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) A health maintenance
organization shall provide any insurance producer who has
contracted with the health maintenance organization with access
to a complete list of every participating provider that provides
health care services through the health maintenance organization.
(b) A health maintenance organization shall make the
information described in subsection (a) available on the health
maintenance organization's portal for insurance producer
communications.
SECTION 29. IC 27-19-3-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. The commissioner shall have
the authority to do the following:
(1) Establish any program, promulgate any rule, policy,
guideline, or plan, or change any program, rule, policy, or
guideline to:
(A) implement;
HEA 1260 — Concur

34
(B) establish;
(C) create;
(D) administer; or
(E) otherwise operate;
a health benefit exchange.
(2) Apply for, accept, or expend federal money related to the
creation, implementation, or operation of a health benefit
exchange.
(3) Establish any advisory board or committee that the
commissioner deems necessary to provide recommendations
on the creation, implementation, or operation of a health
benefit exchange.
SECTION 30. IC 34-30-2.1-402, AS ADDED BY P.L.105-2022,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 402. IC 27-1-3-22 (Concerning persons or
entities reporting fraudulent insurance acts).
SECTION 31. An emergency is declared for this act.
HEA 1260 — Concur

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1260 — Concur